North Dakota, session 69, HB1037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - AGRICULTURE COMMISSIONER - ONE-TIME
FUNDING - REPORT TO THE LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $750,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the agriculture commissioner for the purpose of providing uncrewed
aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or other autonomous technology grants to
individuals and entities in the agriculture industry, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this subsection is
considered a one-time funding item.
2. The agriculture commissioner shall develop an application process and guidelines for
the grants, including eligibility criteria, maximum grant awards, and matching
requirements. The agriculture commissioner may require an individual or entity to
provide one dollar of matching funds for every four dollars awarded by the state. To be
eligible for a grant, an individual or entity shall certify to the agriculture commissioner
that the operation of the uncrewed aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or other
autonomous technology is related to the inspection, operation, maintenance, or
construction of agriculture property or infrastructure.
Page No. 1 25.0401.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3. An individual or entity may use grant funding to contract for services related to
uncrewed aircraft systems, autonomous vehicles, or other autonomous technologies;
or for other eligible uses related to uncrewed aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or
other autonomous technology operations as determined by the agriculture
commissioner.
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the agriculture commissioner shall provide at least one
report to the legislative management regarding the grants, including a list of grant
recipients, the amounts awarded, and a description of the use of the grant funding.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - ATTORNEY GENERAL - ONE TIME FUNDING -
REPORT TO THE LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $750,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the attorney general for the purpose of providing uncrewed aircraft
system, autonomous vehicle, or other autonomous technology grants to individuals
and entities aiding the bureau of criminal investigation in conducting missing person
searches, crime scene reconstruction, and law enforcement first response operations,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding
provided in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
2. The attorney general shall develop an application process and guidelines for the
grants, including eligibility criteria, maximum grant awards, and matching
requirements. The attorney general may require an individual or entity to provide one
dollar of matching funds for every four dollars awarded by the state. To be eligible for a
grant, an individual or entity shall certify to the attorney general that the operation of
the uncrewed aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or other autonomous technology is
related to conducting missing person searches, crime scene reconstruction, and law
enforcement first response operations.
3. An individual or entity may use grant funding to contract for services related to
uncrewed aircraft systems, autonomous vehicles, or other autonomous technologies;
or for other eligible uses related to uncrewed aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or
other autonomous technology operations as determined by the attorney general.
Page No. 2 25.0401.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the attorney general shall provide a report to the
legislative management regarding the grants, including a list of grant recipients, the
amounts awarded, and a description of the use of the grant funding.
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION - ONE-TIME
FUNDING - REPORT TO THE LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $750,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the department of transportation for the purpose of providing uncrewed
aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or other autonomous technology grants to
individuals and entities seeking to monitor the United States highway 2 corridor within
the state to assist and aid local and state law enforcement agencies, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this
section is considered a one-time funding item.
2. The department of transportation shall develop an application process and guidelines
for the grants, including eligibility criteria, maximum grant awards, and matching
requirements. The department of transportation may require an individual or entity to
provide one dollar of matching funds for every four dollars awarded by the state. To be
eligible for a grant, an individual or entity shall certify to the department of
transportation that the operation of the uncrewed aircraft system, autonomous vehicle,
or other autonomous technology is related to monitoring the United States highway 2
corridor within the state to assist local and state law enforcement agencies.
3. An individual or entity may use grant funding to contract for services related to
uncrewed aircraft systems, autonomous vehicles, or other autonomous technologies;
or for other eligible uses related to uncrewed aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or
other autonomous technology operations as determined by the department of
transportation.
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the department of transportation shall provide a report to
the legislative management regarding the grants, including a list of grant recipients,
the amounts awarded, and a description of the use of the grant funding.
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES -
ONE-TIME FUNDING - REPORT TO THE LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT.
Page No. 3 25.0401.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $750,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the department of health and human services for the purpose of
providing uncrewed aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or other autonomous
technology grants to individuals and entities seeking to aid the functions and
operations of rural emergency medical services and rural ambulance service districts
relating to emergency response and disaster mitigation, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this section is
considered a one-time funding item.
2. The department of health and human services shall develop an application process
and guidelines for the grants, including eligibility criteria, maximum grant awards, and
matching requirements. The department of health and human services may require an
individual or entity to provide one dollar of matching funds for every four dollars
awarded by the state. To be eligible for a grant, an individual or entity shall certify to
the department of health and human services that the operation of the uncrewed
aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or other autonomous technology is related to
aiding the functions and operations of rural emergency medical services and rural
ambulance service districts for emergency response and disaster mitigation.
3. An individual or entity may use grant funding to contract for services related to
uncrewed aircraft systems, autonomous vehicles, or other autonomous technologies;
or for other eligible uses related to uncrewed aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or
other autonomous technology operations as determined by the department of health
and human services.
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the department of health and human services shall
provide a report to the legislative management regarding the grants, including a list of
grant recipients, the amounts awarded, and a description of the use of the grant
funding.
SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF CAREER AND TECHNICAL
EDUCATION - ONE-TIME FUNDING - REPORT TO THE LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $750,000, or so much of the sum as may be
Page No. 4 25.0401.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
necessary, to the department of career and technical education for the purpose of
providing uncrewed aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or other autonomous
technology grants to a workforce training center serving the northwest area of the
state to assist in providing workforce training to minimize workforce shortages in the
state, including the oil and gas industry, and to create and develop a drone racing
course, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The
funding provided in this subsection is considered a one-time funding item.
2. The department of career and technical education shall develop an application
process and guidelines for the grants, including eligibility criteria, maximum grant
awards, and matching requirements. The department of career and technical
education may require a workforce training center to provide one dollar of matching
funds for every four dollars awarded by the state. To be eligible for a grant, a
workforce training center shall certify to the department of career and technical
education that the operation of the uncrewed aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or
other autonomous technology is related to providing workforce training to minimize
workforce shortages in the state, including the oil and gas industry, and to create and
develop a drone racing course.
3. A workforce training center may use grant funding to contract for services related to
uncrewed aircraft systems, autonomous vehicles, or other autonomous technologies;
for educational or training curriculum expenses related to uncrewed aircraft systems,
autonomous vehicles, or other autonomous technologies; or for other eligible uses
related to uncrewed aircraft system, autonomous vehicle, or other autonomous
technology operations as determined by the department of career and technical
education.
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the department of career and technical education shall
provide at least one report to the legislative management regarding the grants,
including a list of grant recipients, the amounts awarded, and a description of the use
of the grant funding.
SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - AUTONOMOUS SYSTEMS.
During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall study the economic impacts
and benefits of investing in autonomous technology infrastructure within the state. The study
Page No. 5 25.0401.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
must include an analysis of the sectors using autonomous systems and the sectors that could
benefit from the use of autonomous systems. The study also must quantify the return on
investment stemming from all funds appropriated by the legislative assembly for the purposes of
developing and enhancing autonomous systems in the state. The legislative management shall
report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the
recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.
Page No. 6 25.0401.02000